District of Columbia statutes.
2-358.03

Electronic inventory control system for surplus property.

The CPO shall establish an electronic inventory control system to monitor all surplus property. The system shall contain the following information:

(1)

The date of the receipt of the surplus property;

(2)

The agency or organization from which the surplus property was received;

(3)

A description of the surplus property, including quantity and condition;

(4)

A photograph of the surplus property; and

(5)

The estimated value of the surplus property.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 803, 58 DCR 1185
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1012(b), 62 DCR 10905

Cross References

As to applicability of §§ 2-352.06, 2-358.03, and 2-361.01, see § 2-362.03.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1001 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

Section 1203 of D.C. Law 18-371 provided that this section shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7015 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203.

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.